Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Reproduction and Destruction of Records
of Municipally-Owned Utilities

§ 21-27-91.
Definitions.

Whenever used in Sections 21-27-91 through 21-27-103:

The term “municipality” shall be defined as it is in subdivision (a) of Section 21-27-11;

The term “system” shall be defined as including any waterworks system, water supply system, sewage system, sewage disposal system, or any combination thereof, including any combined waterworks and sewage system, consisting of an existing waterworks system or water supply system or both, combined with an existing sewage system or sewage disposal system or both, or consisting of an existing waterworks system or water supply system or both, combined with a sewage system or sewage disposal system or both, to be acquired, or consisting of an existing sewage system or sewage disposal system or both, combined with a waterworks system or water supply system or both, to be acquired, gas producing, generating, transmission or distribution system, or any one or all thereof, electric generating, transmission, or distribution system, garbage disposal system, rubbish disposal system, and incinerators, and all parts and appurtenances thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-41; Laws, 1956, ch 395, § 1.

§ 21-27-93.
General grant of authority.

The governing authorities of any municipality which now owns and operates any system or systems, but which has not adopted and set up a public utility commission as provided in Section 21-27-13, and the public utility commission of such municipalities that have adopted and set up a public utility commission as provided in said section, are authorized and vested with the authority to microfilm, photograph, photostat, or otherwise reproduce records of the municipally-owned utilities of such municipality. However, the destruction or disposal of any books containing the minutes of any municipal board or of any municipal public utility commission, contracts in effect, real estate deeds, or records showing the date of acquisition, depreciation, or disposition of capital assets, is not hereby authorized.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-42; Laws, 1956, ch. 395, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 447, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 21-27-95.
Reproduction of records.

Any municipality or public utility commission desiring to reproduce by microfilm, photograph, photostat or other process, the records of municipal system or systems under the authority granted in Section 21-27-93 are authorized and vested with the authority to purchase or acquire any equipment, materials and supplies necessary therefor, or to contract for the reproducing of said records in accordance with Section 31-7-1 et seq. Any such contract shall not exceed a period of twelve (12) months.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-43; Laws, 1956, ch. 395, § 3; Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 19, eff from and after January 1, 1981.

§ 21-27-97.
Destruction of records; admissibility of reproductions, copies, facsimiles, etc.

Any reproduction or copy of any original record shall be deemed to be the original record for all purposes and shall be admissible as evidence in all courts or administrative agencies. A facsimile, exemplification or certified copy thereof shall, for all purposes set forth herein, be deemed to be a transcript, exemplification or certified copy of the original record.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-44; Laws, 1956, ch. 395, § 4; Laws, 1995, ch. 447, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 21-27-99.
Reproductions to be confidential and privileged if original records are likewise.

When any of the records of which reproductions are made are declared by law, or are by their nature confidential and privileged records, then the reproduction thereof shall likewise be deemed to be confidential and privileged to the same extent as the original records.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-46; Laws, 1956, ch. 395, § 6.

§ 21-27-101.
Expenses in reproduction of records.

The governing authorities of any municipality not operating with a public utility commission, is hereby authorized to pay all expenses incurred in reproducing such records and in making provision for the preservation, retention and storage of such reproductions from the general fund of such municipality. A municipal public utility commission shall pay for the same from the earnings of the municipally-owned utility or utilities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-45; Laws, 1956, ch. 395, § 5.

§ 21-27-103.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1995, ch. 447, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

[Codes, 1942, § 3519-47; Laws, 1956, ch. 395, § 7]